Massachusetts, session 194th, S1777.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 48 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is hereby
amended by adding the following new section;
Section 42B. Fire chief qualifications; work history of candidates for fire chief: No
person shall be eligible to be appointed to the position of Fire Chief, and/or Fire Commissioner,
and/or Head of a Fire Department in any City, Town or Fire District within the Commonwealth
unless said candidate has been a uniformed member of the Massachusetts firefighting force of a
Massachusetts Fire Department for a minimum of five years.
of 1